test/data/dictyamls/dict-gt-yamls/V-lex_luuhad_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
  Verb - vuollâđ: # MLO, checked, imperative added
    vuollâđ+V+Inf: vuollâđ
    vuollâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vuolâm
    vuollâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: vuolah
    vuollâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vuáḷâ
    vuollâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: vyelˊleen
    vuollâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: vuoˊḷâvettee
    vuollâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: vuollâv
    vuollâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: vuollâp
    vuollâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: vuoˊḷâvetteđ
    vuollâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: vyeḷih
    vuollâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: vuollim
    vuollâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: vuollih
    vuollâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: vuolâi
    vuollâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: vuoláim
    vuollâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: vuoláid
    vuollâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: vuoláin
    vuollâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: vuolâim
    vuollâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: vuolâid
    vuollâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: vuolˊlii
    vuollâđ+V+Cond+Sg1: vuoˊlâččim
    vuollâđ+V+Cond+Sg2: vuoˊlâččih
    vuollâđ+V+Cond+Sg3: vuoˊlâččij
    vuollâđ+V+Cond+Du1: vuoˊlâččáim
    vuollâđ+V+Cond+Du2: vuoˊlâččáid
    vuollâđ+V+Cond+Du3: vuoˊlâččáin
    vuollâđ+V+Cond+Pl1: vuoˊlâččijm
    vuollâđ+V+Cond+Pl2: vuoˊlâččijd
    vuollâđ+V+Cond+Pl3: vuoˊlâččii
    vuollâđ+V+Pot+Sg1: vyeˊleem
    vuollâđ+V+Pot+Sg2: vyeˊleeh
    vuollâđ+V+Pot+Sg3: vuolâš
    vuollâđ+V+Pot+Du1: vuoˊlâžeen
    vuollâđ+V+Pot+Du2: vuolâšvettee
    vuollâđ+V+Pot+Du3: vuoˊlâžává
    vuollâđ+V+Pot+Pl1: vuoˊlâžep
    vuollâđ+V+Pot+Pl2: vuolâšvetteđ
    vuollâđ+V+Pot+Pl3: vuoˊlâžeh
    vuollâđ+V+Imprt+Sg1: vuálˊloom
    vuollâđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: vuolâ
    vuollâđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: vuáˊlus
    vuollâđ+V+Imprt+Du1: vuálˊloon
    vuollâđ+V+Imprt+Du2: vyelˊlee
    vuollâđ+V+Imprt+Du3: vuállus
    vuollâđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: vuállup
    vuollâđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: vuollâđ
    vuollâđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: vuállus
    vuollâđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: vuolâ
    vuollâđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: vuollâm
    vuollâđ+V+Cond+ConNeg: vuoˊlâččii
    vuollâđ+V+Pot+ConNeg: vuolii
    vuollâđ+V+PrsPrc: vyelˊlee
    vuollâđ+V+PrfPrc: vuollâm
    vuollâđ+V+Actio: vuollâm
    vuollâđ+V+Actio+Ess: vuoˊḷâmin
    vuollâđ+V+Actio+Loc: vuoˊḷâmist
    vuollâđ+V+Actio+Ill: vuoˊḷâmist
    vuollâđ+V+Ger: vuoˊlâdijn
    vuollâđ+V+VAbess: vuoˊlâhánnáá
